Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.090

License without examination—Reciprocity—National board examinees—Fee.

Any applicant who meets the requirements of RCW 18.71.050 and has been licensed under the laws of another state, territory, or possession of the United States, or of any province of Canada, or an applicant who has satisfactorily passed examinations given by the national board of medical examiners may, in the discretion of the commission, be granted a license without examination on the payment of the fees required by this chapter: PROVIDED, That the applicant must file with the commission a copy of the license certified by the proper authorities of the issuing state to be a full, true copy thereof, and must show that the standards, eligibility requirements, and examinations of that state are at least equal in all respects to those of this state.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 314; 1985 c 322 s 5. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 12; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 63; 1961 c 284 s 9; 1957 c 60 s 5; 1919 c 134 s 11; RRS s 10023.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.